Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-427
Statute of limitations.

A person charged with any offense is not liable to be tried by court-martial or punished under section 55-416 or 55-481 if the offense was committed more than two years before the receipt of sworn charges and specifications by an officer exercising court-martial jurisdiction as set forth in the code.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 27, p. 1566;

Laws 2016, LB754, § 13.